Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.480

Fractional units as fractional value.

Fractional parts of any unit of weight or measure shall mean like fractional parts of the value of such unit as prescribed in RCW 19.94.150.

[ 1992 c 237 s 30; 1969 c 67 s 48.]